Georgia, session 2025_26, HB210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 3 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to alcoholic beverages is amended
by revising Code Section 3-4-21, relating to prohibition of holding or having beneficial
interest in more than two retail dealer licenses, as follows:
"3-4-21.
(a)(1) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (d) of this Code section, no No person
shall be issued or have a beneficial interest in, regardless of the degree of such interest,
more than two retail dealer licenses, nor shall any person be permitted to have a
H. B. 210
- 1 -

LC 55 0427
beneficial interest in more than two retail dealer licenses issued under this chapter,
regardless of the degree of such interest.
(b)(1) In addition to the two retail dealer licenses that a person may be issued or have a
beneficial interest in pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section and subject to the
limitations provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a person may be issued or have
a beneficial interest in additional retail dealer licenses provided that the place of business
in connection with each such additional retail dealer license is located in a county that,
as of the most recent fiscal year, collected $750 million or more in tax revenue. For
purposes of this paragraph, the determination of whether a county has, as of the most
recent fiscal year, collected $750 million or more in tax revenue shall be made at the time
a person applies for such additional retail dealer license or at the time a person obtains
a beneficial interest in such additional retail dealer license and such additional retail
dealer license shall not be impacted by the amount of tax revenue collected by such
county in future fiscal years.
(2) The number of additional retail dealer licenses that a person may be issued or have
a beneficial interest in pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be as follows:
(A) Prior to July 1, 2026, no person shall be issued more than one such additional retail
dealer license;
(B) Prior to July 1, 2027, no person shall be issued or have a beneficial interest in more
than two such additional retail dealer licenses;
(C) Prior to July 1, 2028, no person shall be issued or have a beneficial interest in more
than three such additional retail dealer licenses;
(D) Prior to July 1, 2029, no person shall be issued or have a beneficial interest in more
than four such additional retail dealer licenses;
(E) Prior to July 1, 2030, no person shall be issued or have a beneficial interest in more
than five such additional retail dealer licenses;
H. B. 210
- 2 -

LC 55 0427
(F) Prior to July 1, 2031, no person shall be issued or have a beneficial interest in more
than six such additional retail dealer licenses; and
(G) On and after July 1, 2032, no person shall be issued or have a beneficial interest
in more than seven such additional retail dealer licenses.
(b)(c) As used in For purposes of this Code section:
(1) The term 'person' shall include all members of a retail dealer licensee's family; and
the term 'family' shall include any person related to the holder of the license within the
first degree of consanguinity and affinity as computed according to the canon law.
(2) The beneficiaries of a trust shall be considered to have a beneficial interest in any
business forming a part of the trust estate.
(c)(d) Nothing contained in this Code section shall prohibit the reissuance of a valid retail
dealer license if the license has been:
(1) Held prior to the creation of any of the above relationships by marriage; or
(2) Held prior to April 3, 1978."
SECTION 2.
Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 3-4-21.1, relating to requirement for
retail license and application of existing license to new location, as follows:
"3-4-21.1.
(a) A separate retail license shall be required for each place of business.
(b) In cases where a retail licensee is moving his their package sales business to a different
location, he such licensee shall be authorized to make application to have the license for
the location previously occupied apply to the new location. Anything contained in Code
Section 3-4-21 to the contrary notwithstanding, if the retail licensee complies with all other
requirements of law, the commissioner shall authorize the existing license to apply to the
new location; provided, however, that, if the retail license in connection with the location
previously occupied is an additional retail dealer license issued pursuant to paragraph (1)
H. B. 210
- 3 -

LC 55 0427
of subsection (b) of Code Section 3-4-21, such license shall only apply to the new location
if the new location is located in the same county as the location previously occupied."
SECTION 3.
Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 3-15-2, relating to terms and
conditions for limited tasting events, as follows:
"3-15-2.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, in all counties and municipalities in which
the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful, retail package liquor stores shall be authorized to
conduct up to 52 104 tasting events per calendar year, subject to the following terms and
conditions:
(1) A tasting event shall only take place on the licensed premises and only at times at
which such alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold on such licensed premises;
(2) Only one tasting event per day may be held on the licensed premises and such tasting
event shall not exceed four hours;
(3) Only one type of alcoholic beverage may be served at a tasting event, either malt
beverages, wine, or distilled spirits; provided, however, that more than one brand of such
type of alcoholic beverage may be offered so long as not more than four packages are
open at any one time;
(4) If the tasting event is for malt beverages, a consumer shall not be served more than
eight ounces of malt beverages during such tasting event. If the tasting event is for wine,
a consumer shall not be served more than five ounces of wine during such tasting event.
If the tasting event is for distilled spirits, a consumer shall not be served more than one
and one-half ounces of distilled spirits during such tasting event;
(5) Only alcoholic beverages that the licensee is licensed to sell on the licensed premises
may be offered as part of a tasting event, and such alcoholic beverages shall be part of the
licensee's inventory;
H. B. 210
- 4 -

LC 55 0427
(6) Only food that is lawful to sell on the licensed premises, under this title or under any
rules or regulations of the commissioner, may be served as part of a tasting event. Such
food shall be offered at no cost to the consumer;
(7) Any operator or employee of the licensee may refuse to provide any brand, type, or
quantity of alcoholic beverage to any consumer;
100 (8) The licensee shall notify the governing authority of the county or municipality in
101 which the licensed premises is located prior to holding a tasting event;
102 (9) Any broken package containing alcoholic beverages on the licensed premises that is
103 not licensed for retail sales for consumption on the premises shall be kept locked in a
104 secure room or cabinet by the operator of the licensed premises except when in use
105 during a tasting event;
106 (10) Representatives and salespersons of manufacturers or wholesalers may attend a
107 tasting event; provided, however, that such representatives and salespersons shall not host
108 the tasting event, pour any alcoholic beverage, or provide anything of value to any
109 consumer or to the licensee or an employee of a licensee; and
110 (11) Any other terms, conditions, and limitations as may be required or imposed by the
111 governing authority of the county or municipality in which the licensed premises is
112 located."
113 SECTION 4.
114 This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
115 SECTION 5.
116 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 210
- 5 -